Rhode Island, session 2025, SB313.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 37-8 of the General Laws entitled "Public Buildings" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
37-8-9.1. Senate president's portraits.
The secretary of state shall cause a portrait to be painted of each president of the senate as
soon after the president of the senate is inducted into office, including former presidents of the
senate. Whenever any portrait is finished, the secretary of state shall deliver the portrait to the
department of administration to be hung in the senate lounge or thereabouts and the state controller
is hereby authorized and directed to draw the controller's order, upon the general treasurer for a
sum sufficient to pay for any portrait out of any money in the treasury not otherwise appropriated
upon receipt of vouchers approved by the secretary of state.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000418/SUB A
========